Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.447

Suicide assessment, treatment, and management—Curriculum for dental students and dentists.

(1) By July 1, 2020, the school of dentistry at the University of Washington shall develop a curriculum on suicide assessment, treatment, and management for dental students and licensed dentists. The curriculum must meet the minimum standards established under RCW 43.70.442 and must include material on identifying at-risk patients and limiting access to lethal means. When developing the curriculum, the school of dentistry must consult with experts on suicide assessment, treatment, and management and with the suicide-safer homes task force established in *RCW 43.70.445. The school of dentistry shall submit a progress report to the governor and the relevant committees of the legislature by July 1, 2019.

(2) The dental quality assurance commission shall, for purposes of RCW 43.70.442(4)(a), consider a dentist who has successfully completed the curriculum developed under subsection (1) of this section prior to licensure as possessing the minimum training and experience necessary to be exempt from the training requirements in RCW 43.70.442.

[ 2017 c 262 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.70.445 expired July 1, 2021.

Findings—Intent—2017 c 262: See note following RCW 43.70.442.